src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: kamar
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: kamar
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: kamari
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: kamars
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: kømur
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: kømur
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: [kømurum, kømrum]
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: kamara
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: kamarið
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: kamarið
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: kamarinum
    kamar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: kamarsins
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: kømrini
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: kømrini
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: kømrunum
    kamar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: kamaranna
